Florida, session 2026, HB1041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 295.189, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
295.189 Business development incentives for veterans and
military spouses.—
(1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Florida
Veterans and Military Spouses Business Development Act."
(2) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1041-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1041 2026
(a) The Legislature finds that veterans and military
spouses contribute significantly to this state's economy through
their skills, expertise, and entrepreneurial efforts.
(b) The Legislature recognizes the challenges of frequent
relocations and economic instability faced by many military
spouses.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act
attract and support veteran-owned and military spouse-owned
businesses by providing incentives.
(3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Military spouse" means a spouse of:
1. An active duty member of the United States Armed
Forces; or
2. A veteran.
(b) "Veteran" has the same meaning as in s. 1.01(14).
(c) "Veteran-owned or military spouse-owned business"
means a business entity:
1. That employs 200 or fewer permanent full-time
employees.
2. That, together with its affiliates, has a net worth of
$5 million or less or, if a sole proprietorship, has a net worth
of $5 million or less including personal and business
investments.
3. That is organized to engage in commercial transactions.
4. That is domiciled in this state.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1041-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1041 2026
5. That is at least 51 percent owned and operated by one
or more veterans or military spouses.
6. The management and daily business operations of which
are controlled by one or more veterans or military spouses.
7. That has a professional license, if required by the
industry, in the name of a veteran or military spouse who owns
the business entity.
(4) FEE WAIVER.—
(a) The Department of State shall waive all fees for:
1. A new business established by a veteran or military
spouse.
2. An existing veteran-owned or military spouse-owned
business that relocates to this state.
(b) The Department of State shall establish registration
requirements for such fee waivers, which must include:
1. For veterans, a DD Form 214 or another acceptable form
of identification as specified by the United States Department
of Veterans' Affairs; or
2. For military spouses, verification of a military spouse
relationship and that the other spouse is on active duty or a
veteran.
(c) The fee waivers apply to veteran-owned or military
spouse-owned businesses established between July 1, 2026, and
June 30, 2031.
(5) TAX EXEMPTIONS.—
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1041-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1041 2026
(a) Eligible veteran-owned and military spouse-owned
businesses shall receive:
1. A 5-year tax exemption from the corporate income tax.
a. A business that is 100 percent veteran-owned or
military spouse-owned shall receive the 5-year tax exemption
after being in business for at least 5 years.
b. A business that is at least 51 percent veteran-owned or
military spouse-owned but does not qualify for the tax exemption
under sub-subparagraph a. shall receive the 5-year tax exemption
after being in business for at least 7 years.
2. A one-time sales tax exemption on equipment and
supplies directly related to business operations.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall establish procedures
for claiming the tax exemptions.
(c) For veteran-owned and military spouse-owned businesses
relocating to this state, the tax exemptions apply for 5 years
after the date on which the business is established.
(6) ADMINISTRATION.—The Department of Veterans' Affairs,
the Department of Revenue, and the Department of State shall:
(a) Develop rules for administering this section.
(b) Ensure interagency cooperation for seamless
implementation of this section.
(7) ANNUAL REPORTING.—Beginning December 31, 2026, and
each December 31 thereafter, the Department of Veterans' Affairs
100 shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1041-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1041 2026
101 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives that
102 includes:
103 (a) The number of veteran-owned and military spouse-owned
104 businesses that were established in this state or that relocated
105 to this state.
106 (b) Economic metrics such as job creation and tax revenue
107 impact from veteran-owned and military spouse-owned businesses.
108 (c) Demographic data for the participating veterans and
109 military spouses.
110 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1041-01-c1